Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-3506
Criminal history record information,
defined.

Criminal history record information shall mean information
collected by criminal justice agencies on individuals consisting of identifiable
descriptions and notations of issuance of arrest warrants, arrests, detentions,
indictments, charges by information, and other formal criminal charges, and
any disposition arising from such arrests, charges, sentencing, correctional
supervision, and release. Criminal
history record information shall include any judgment against or settlement
with the state as a result of a wrongful conviction pursuant to the Nebraska
Claims for Wrongful Conviction and Imprisonment Act. Criminal
history record information shall not include intelligence or investigative
information.

Laws 1978, LB 713, § 6;

Laws 2009, LB260, § 9.

Nebraska Claims for Wrongful Conviction and Imprisonment Act, see section 29-4601.

This section has no application to presentence reports and does not restrict the use of criminal history information in determining an appropriate sentence. State v. Guida, 230 Neb. 961, 434 N.W.2d 522 (1989).